Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2855
Pharmacy; temporary educational permits; issuance.

The department, with the recommendation of the board, shall have authority to issue temporary educational permits to qualified applicants in accordance with the Pharmacy Practice Act.

Laws 1978, LB 675, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 458;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 119;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.22;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 951.